Wyoming, session 2025, HB0081.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 40-23-124(c) by creating a new
paragraph (vi) is amended to read:

40-23-124. Loan originator licensing; registration;
rulemaking.

(c) An individual is exempt from subsection (a) of
this section if he is:

HB0081

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0447
(vi) An individual who acts as or engages in the
business of a mortgage loan originator, without
compensation or gain, by providing loan financing for not
more than five (5) residential mortgage loans in any twelve
(12) month period. For purposes of this exemption,
"compensation or gain" shall exclude any interest paid
under the loan financing provided;

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0081